nb: Kvalitet på piletre: Grad 1; Grad 1 Plus; Grad 2; Grad 3; Grad 4; Grad 5; Spillergrad; Proffgrad; Trening/øvelse; Annet
ko: 버드나무 등급: 1등급; 1 플러스 등급; 2등급; 3등급; 4등급; 5등급; 플레이어 등급; 프로 등급; 훈련/연습용; 기타
pt-PT: Categoria do salgueiro: Grau 1; Grau 1 Plus; Grau 2; Grau 3; Grau 4; Grau 5; Grau de jogador; Grau profissional; Treino/prática; Outro
sk-SK: Vŕbová trieda: Trieda 1; Trieda 1 Plus; Trieda 2; Trieda 3; Trieda 4; Trieda 5; Hráčska trieda; Profesionálna trieda; Tréningová/cvičná; Iné
sv: Pilträ - kvalitet: Klass 1; Klass 1 Plus; Klass 2; Klass 3; Klass 4; Klass 5; Spelarklass; Proffsklass; Träning/övning; Övrigt
bg-BG: Клас на върбовата дървесина: Клас 1; Клас 1 Plus; Клас 2; Клас 3; Клас 4; Клас 5; Клас за играчи; Професионален клас; За тренировка/упражнения; Друго
sl-SI: Razred vrbovega lesa: Razred 1; Razred 1 Plus; Razred 2; Razred 3; Razred 4; Razred 5; Igralski razred; Profesionalni razred; Vadba/trening; Drugo
pt-BR: Salgueiro classificação: Grau 1; Grau 1 Plus; Grau 2; Grau 3; Grau 4; Grau 5; Grau Player; Grau Pro; Treinamento/Prática; Outro
lt-LT: Gluosnio veislė: 1 klasė; 1 klasė „Plus“; 2 klasė; 3 klasė; 4 klasė; 5 klasė; Žaidėjo klasė; Profesionalų klasė; Treniruočių / praktikos; Kita
it: Grado Willow: Grado 1; Grado 1 Plus; Grado 2; Grado 3; Grado 4; Grado 5; Grado giocatore; Grado pro; Allenamento/pratica; Altro
da: Pilekvalitet: Grad 1; Grad 1 Plus; Grad 2; Grad 3; Grad 4; Grad 5; Player Grade; Pro Grade; Træning/øvelse; Andet
de: Qualitätsstufe des Weidenholzes: Grade 1; Grade 1 Plus; Grade 2; Grade 3; Grade 4; Grade 5; Player Grade; Pro Grade; Training/Übung; Andere
es: Grado del sauce: Grado 1; Grado 1 Plus; Grado 2; Grado 3; Grado 4; Grado 5; Grado de jugador; Grado profesional; Entrenamiento/práctica; Otro
th: เกรดวิลโลว์: เกรด 1; เกรด 1 พลัส; เกรด 2; เกรด 3; เกรด 4; เกรด 5; เกรดเพลย์เยอร์; เกรดโปร; ฝึกซ้อม/ฝึกปฏิบัติ; อื่นๆ
cs: Třída vrby: Třída 1; Třída 1 Plus; Třída 2; Třída 3; Třída 4; Třída 5; Třída Player; Třída Pro; Tréninkové / cvičné; Jiné
en: Willow grade: Grade 1; Grade 1 Plus; Grade 2; Grade 3; Grade 4; Grade 5; Player Grade; Pro Grade; Training/Practice; Other
vi: Cấp độ Willow: Hạng 1; Hạng 1 Plus; Hạng 2; Hạng 3; Hạng 4; Hạng 5; Hạng cầu thủ; Hạng chuyên nghiệp; Huấn luyện/Tập luyện; Khác
hr-HR: Stupanj vrbe: Klasa 1; Klasa 1 Plus; Klasa 2; Klasa 3; Klasa 4; Klasa 5; Klasa za igrače; Pro klasa; Trening / praksa; Ostalo
el: Κατηγορία ποιότητας ιτιάς: Κατηγορία ποιότητας 1; Κατηγορία ποιότητας 1 Plus; Κατηγορία ποιότητας 2; Κατηγορία ποιότητας 3; Κατηγορία ποιότητας 4; Κατηγορία ποιότητας 5; Player Grade; Pro Grade; Προπόνηση/Εξάσκηση; Άλλο
zh-TW: 柳木等級: 第 1 級; 第 1 級 Plus; 第 2 級; 第 3 級; 第 4 級; 第 5 級; 球員級; 職業級; 訓練/練習; 其他
pl: Klasa wierzby: Klasa 1; Klasa 1 Plus; Klasa 2; Klasa 3; Klasa 4; Klasa 5; Klasa gracza; Klasa Pro; Treningowa; Inna
nl: Wilg kwaliteit: Grade 1; Grade 1 Plus; Grade 2; Grade 3; Grade 4; Grade 5; Player Grade; Pro Grade; Training/oefening; Overig
tr: Söğüt kalite derecesi: Sınıf 1; Sınıf 1 Plus; Sınıf 2; Sınıf 3; Sınıf 4; Sınıf 5; Oyuncu Sınıfı; Profesyonel Sınıf; Eğitim/antrenman; Diğer
ru: Класс ивы: Сорт 1; Сорт 1 Плюс; Сорт 2; Сорт 3; Сорт 4; Сорт 5; Игровой сорт; Профессиональный сорт; Для тренировок/практики; Другое
fr: Qualité du saule: Grade 1; Grade 1 Plus; Grade 2; Grade 3; Grade 4; Grade 5; Qualité joueur; Qualité pro; Entraînement/Pratique; Autre
zh-CN: 柳木等级: 1 级; 1+ 级; 2 级; 3 级; 4 级; 5 级; 球员级; 职业级; 训练/练习; 其他
ja: ヤナギグレード: グレード 1; グレード 1 プラス; グレード 2; グレード 3; グレード 4; グレード 5; プレーヤーグレード; プログレード; トレーニング/練習用; その他
ro-RO: Calitatea lemnului de salcie: Grad 1; Grad 1 Plus; Grad 2; Grad 3; Grad 4; Grad 5; Grad Player; Grad Pro; Antrenament/Practică; Altele
hu: Fűzfa minőségi osztálya: 1. osztályú; 1. Plusz osztályú; 2. osztályú; 3. osztályú; 4. osztályú; 5. osztályú; Játékos minőség; Profi minőség; Edzés/Gyakorlás; Egyéb
fi: Pajun laatu: Luokka 1; Luokka 1 Plus; Luokka 2; Luokka 3; Luokka 4; Luokka 5; Player-luokka; Pro-luokka; Harjoittelu/treeni; Muu